Maine, session 132, LD1024.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17-A MRSA §1111-B, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 507, §§1
to 4, is further amended by amending subparagraph (22) to read:
(22) OUI as described in Title 29‑A, section 2411; and
Sec. 2. 17-A MRSA §1111-B, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 507, §§1
to 4, is further amended by amending subparagraph (23) to read:
(23) Operating or attempting to operate a watercraft under the influence as
described in Title 12, section 10701, subsection 1‑A, paragraph B, a snowmobile
under the influence as described in Title 12, section 10701, subsection 1‑A,
paragraph C or an ATV under the influence as described in Title 12, section 10701,
subsection 1‑A, paragraph D.; and
Sec. 3. 17-A MRSA §1111-B, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 507, §§1
to 4, is further amended by enacting a new subparagraph (24) to read:
(24) Possession of a firearm by a prohibited person as described in Title 15, section
393;
Sec. 4. 17-A MRSA §1111-B, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 507, §§1
to 4, is further amended by enacting a new subparagraph (25) to read:
(25) Unlawful trafficking in scheduled drugs as described in section 1103; and
Sec. 5. 17-A MRSA §1111-B, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 507, §§1
to 4, is further amended by enacting a new subparagraph (26) to read:
(26) Unlawfully furnishing scheduled drugs as described in section 1106.